Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.062

Fees—Charitable organizations—Commercial fund-raisers.

The secretary of state must collect the following fees in accordance with this chapter:

(1) For an application for registration as a charitable organization, a fee of sixty dollars. Twenty dollars of this fee must be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining forty dollars must be deposited in the charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530;

(2) For an annual renewal of registration as a charitable organization, a fee of forty dollars. Ten dollars of this fee must be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining thirty dollars must be deposited in the charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530;

(3) For an application for registration as a commercial fund-raiser, a fee of three hundred dollars. Two hundred fifty dollars of this fee must be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining fifty dollars must be deposited in the charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530;

(4) For an annual renewal of registration as a commercial fund-raiser, a fee of two hundred twenty-five dollars. One hundred seventy-five dollars of this fee must be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining fifty dollars must be deposited in the charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530;

(5) For a registration of a commercial fund-raiser service contract, a fee of twenty dollars. Ten dollars of this fee must be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining ten dollars must be deposited in the charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530.

[ 2011 c 199 s 4; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.